Alaska statutes. Title 18. Health, Safety, Housing, Human Rights, and Public Defender.
Chapter 10. Health Units and Districts.

Cross references. —

For continuation of local health units and districts after adoption of state constitution, see art. XV, § 3, Alaska Const.

Collateral references. —

39 Am. Jur. 2d, Health, §§ 8 — 13.

39A C.J.S., Health and Environment, §§ 7 — 15.

Validity and construction of statute requiring establishment of “need” as precondition to operation of hospital or other facilities for the care of sick people. 61 ALR3d 278.

Sec. 18.10.010.
Local health unit and health board.

Each community or settlement outside an incorporated city is a health unit.
In each health unit there shall be a board of health composed of the president of the school board and two citizens of the unit selected by the school board.
At least one of the members of the health board must, where practicable, be a licensed physician.
In a health unit where there is no school board, the commissioner shall appoint three residents of the unit to the local board of health, at least one member of which must, where practicable, be a licensed physician.

History.

(§ 1 ch 118 SLA 1949)

Sec. 18.10.020.
Health unit in incorporated city.

AS

18.10.010

applies to an incorporated city unless the city otherwise provides for the establishment and maintenance of a local board of health or a health officer.

History.

(§ 1 ch 118 SLA 1949)

Sec. 18.10.030.
Health units in Native villages and communities.

In a Native village, or community composed largely of Natives, where the formation of a board of health is impracticable, the commissioner may delegate to a representative of the Alaska Native Service the authority granted to the local boards of health.

History.

(§ 1 ch 118 SLA 1949)

Sec. 18.10.040.
Health districts.

Two or more contiguous health units of two or more local boards of health for contiguous incorporated cities may be constituted a health district by the department.
Members of the board of health for this type of health district shall be appointed by the department from residents of each health unit or incorporated city represented in the health district in the numbers and for the periods of time determined by the department.

History.

(§ 2 ch 118 SLA 1949)

Sec. 18.10.050.
Commissioner to supervise local health boards.

Each local board of health whether inside or outside incorporated cities, and each representative of the Alaska Native Service acting in the capacity of health officer is responsible to and under the supervision of the commissioner.

History.

(§ 3 ch 118 SLA 1949)

Secs. 18.10.060 — 18.10.250.
Consolidated Health Districts.
[Repealed, § 39 ch 69 SLA 1970.]

Sec. 18.10.260.
Definitions.

In this chapter,

“commissioner” means the commissioner of health and social services;

“department” means the Department of Health and Social Services.

History.

(§ 1 ch 163 SLA 1955; am § 39 ch 69 SLA 1970; am § 6 ch 104 SLA 1971; am § 18 ch 21 SLA 1991)